Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1902
Name of financial institution; use of similar names unlawful; power of department.

It shall be unlawful for two or more financial institutions in the same city, village, or county in this state to have or use the same name or names so nearly alike as to cause confusion in transacting business. In all cases in which a similarity of names now exists, or may hereafter exist, a complaint may be made to the department. If in the judgment of the department a similarity does exist and creates confusion in conducting the business of either or both financial institutions, the department may by order require the financial institution which is junior in time in the use of its name in such city, village, or county to change or modify its name to prevent confusion. The change of name shall be approved by the department.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 31, p. 80;

R.S.1913, § 310;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 31, p. 697;

C.S.1922, § 8011;

C.S.1929, § 8-148;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 31, p. 150;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-148;

R.S.1943, § 8-148;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 23, p. 143;

Laws 1979, LB 220, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 8-123;

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 7.